Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-518
Streets; improvement; sinking fund; investment.

Pending final redemption of warrant or warrants, or bond or bonds for paving, the city or village treasurer is hereby authorized to invest such sinking fund in interest-bearing time certificates of deposit in depositories approved and authorized to receive county money, but in no greater amount in any depository than the same is authorized to receive deposits of county funds; and the interest arising from such certificate of deposit shall be credited to its respective sinking fund as hereinbefore provided.

Laws 1923, c. 135, § 1, p. 332;

Laws 1927, c. 42, § 1, p. 180;

C.S.1929, § 17-432;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 20, p. 532;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-432;

R.S.1943, § 17-518.